Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202483-903.01
State identification card; motor vehicle operator's license; department; duties.

(1) Prior to the discharge of an individual from a facility of the Department of Correctional Services, the department shall provide such individual with an opportunity to obtain a state identification card or renew a motor vehicle operator's license.

(2) The Office of Probation Administration may assist any such individual in obtaining a state identification card or renewing a motor vehicle operator's license. The department shall cooperate with and facilitate the office's involvement in such matter.

Laws 2024, LB631, § 47.
July 19, 2024